California, session 20252026, AB819.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18941.13 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:18941.13. Notwithstanding Section 18941.11 or any other provision of law, parking facilities owned or leased by a church or nonprofit organization exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), shall be exempt from any mandatory building standards that require the installation of electric vehicle charging stations or future electric vehicle charging infrastructure, except designated employee parking spaces.SEC. 2. Section 65850.11 is added to the Government Code, to read:65850.11. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the presence, management, ownership, operation, or maintenance of an electric vehicle charging station, whether directly or by a third party, on property owned by or leased to a church or nonprofit organization shall not destroy, limit, or otherwise impact the following:(1) Any zoning designations for the property.(2) Any licenses, variances, conditional use permits, development plans, entitlements, or any other zoning exceptions or allowances previously obtained for the property.(3) Eligibility for any property tax exemptions or reductions related to the use of the property.(4) Eligibility for exemption from taxation under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2, or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(5) Eligibility for any other tax exemption, incentive, or benefit available to a qualifying church or nonprofit entity, including designation as an exempt entity for all other state law purposes.(b) For purposes of this section, “electric vehicle charging station” means any level of electric vehicle supply equipment station that is designed and built in compliance with Article 625 of the California Electrical Code (Part 3 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), as it read on January 1, 2025, and that delivers electricity from a source outside an electric vehicle into a plug-in electric vehicle. (c) This section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.SEC. 3. Section 23742 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:23742. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, income derived by a church or an organization exempt from taxation under this chapter from an electric vehicle charging station that is located on property owned by or leased to the organization shall not be treated as unrelated business taxable income.(b) For purposes of this section, “electric vehicle charging station” means any level of electric vehicle supply equipment station that is designed and built in compliance with Article 625 of the California Electrical Code (Part 3 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), as it read on January 1, 2025, and that delivers electricity from a source outside an electric vehicle into a plug-in electric vehicle.SEC. 4. (a) For purposes of complying with Section 41 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as it pertains to the exemptions established by Section 65850.11 of the Government Code and Section 23742 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as added by Sections 2 and 3 of this bill, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:(1) The goal of the exemptions is to allow churches and charitable nonprofit organizations to contribute to California’s emissions goals without jeopardizing their tax exemptions.(2) The detailed performance indicators used to determine whether the exemptions are achieving the stated goal are the following:(A) The number of entities exempting income pursuant to Section 23742 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(B) The number of tax-exempt entities installing electric vehicle charging stations.(b) (1) On or before December 1, 2030, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the number of entities exempting income pursuant to Section 23742 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and the number of exempt entities installing electric vehicle charging stations, to the extent data is available.(2) (A) The Legislative Analyst’s Office may request information from the Franchise Tax Board or any other state or local agency to complete the report required by this subdivision.(B) Notwithstanding Section 19542 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the Franchise Tax Board shall provide any information requested, to the extent data is available.(C) Any taxpayer information provided to the Legislative Analyst’s Office from the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to Section 19542 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(3) The disclosure requirements of this subdivision shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.SEC. 5. Notwithstanding Section 2229 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, no appropriation is made by this act and the state shall not reimburse any local agency for any property tax revenues lost by it pursuant to this act.SEC. 6. Notwithstanding Section 2230 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, no appropriation is made by this act and the state shall not reimburse any local agency for any sales and use tax revenues lost by it under this act.SEC. 7. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 23453 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:23453.(a)There shall be allowed as a credit against the regular tax, as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 23455, for each taxable year, an amount equal to the minimum tax credit for that taxable year.(b)For purposes of subdivision (a), the minimum tax credit shall be determined in accordance with Section 53 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided in this part.(c)For purposes of this chapter, the amount determined under Section 53(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be the regular tax, as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 23455, reduced by the sum of the credits allowable under this part other than any credit which reduces the tax below the tentative minimum tax, as described in Section 23455.